California statutes. Financial Code
 registered mail, to every person who may have an interest in the property specified in the petition. However, if the notice cannot be given by registered mail or personal delivery, the notice shall be published for at least three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is located. The notice shall state that any interested person may file a verified claim with the superior court stating the amount of their claimed interest and an affirmation or denial of the prosecuting agency’s allegation. The notice shall set forth the time within which a claim of interest in the property seized is required to be filed.

(b) If the property alleged to be subject to forfeiture is real property, the prosecuting agency shall, at the time of filing the petition of forfeiture, record a lis pendens in each county in which the real property is situated which specifically identifies the property by legal description, the
 name of the owner of record as shown on the latest equalized assessment roll, and assessor’s parcel number. The judgment of forfeiture shall not affect the interest in real property of any third party which was acquired prior to the recording of the lis pendens.

(c) If a petition of forfeiture is filed pursuant to this section prior to filing of the complaint in a criminal action, the prosecuting agency shall provide concurrent notice to any parties subject to the proposed forfeiture that they are targets of an anticipated criminal action.

(d) If a petition of forfeiture is filed pursuant to this section prior to the filing of a complaint in a criminal action, the petition and any injunctive order shall be dismissed by operation of law, unless a criminal complaint or grand jury indictment is filed within 120 days after the filing of the petition. If a petition is dismissed
 pursuant to this section, it shall not be refiled, except upon the filing of a criminal complaint or grand jury indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1280, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5322.

(a) Any person claiming an interest in the property may, at any time within 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice of seizure, or within 30 days after receipt of actual notice, file with the superior court of the county in which the action is pending a verified claim stating his or her interest in the property or proceeds. A verified copy of the claim shall be given by the claimant to the Attorney General or district attorney, as appropriate.

(b) (1) If, at the end of the time set forth in subdivision (a), an interested
 person, other than the defendant, has not filed a claim, the court, upon motion, shall declare that the person has defaulted upon his or her alleged interest, and it shall be subject to forfeiture upon proof of the provisions of subdivision (d).

(2) The defendant may admit or deny that the property is subject to forfeiture pursuant to the provisions of this article. If the defendant fails to admit or deny or to file a claim of interest in the property or proceeds, the court shall enter a response of denial on behalf of the defendant.

(c) (1) The forfeiture proceeding shall be set for hearing in the superior court in which the underlying criminal offense will be tried.

(2) If the defendant is found guilty of the underlying offense, the issue of forfeiture shall be promptly tried, either before
 the same jury or before a new jury in the discretion of the court, unless waived by the consent of all parties.

(d) At the forfeiture hearing, the prosecuting agency shall have the burden of establishing beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant was engaged in actions in violation of Sections 5303, 5304, 5305, and 5306 and that the property specified in the petition otherwise meets the criteria for forfeiture under Section 5320. If a jury is the trier of fact, the verdict shall be unanimous in order to impose the forfeiture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

5323.

(a) Concurrent with, or subsequent to, the filing of the petition, the prosecuting agency may move the superior court for the following pendente lite orders to preserve the status quo of the property alleged in the petition of forfeiture:

(1) An injunction to restrain all interested parties and enjoin them from transferring, encumbering, hypothecating or otherwise disposing of that property.

(2) Appointment of a
 receiver to take possession of, care for, manage, and operate the assets and properties so that such property may be maintained and preserved.

(b) No preliminary injunction may be granted or receiver appointed without notice, that meets the requirements of Section 5321, to all the interested parties, including actual notice to targets of the anticipated criminal action, and a hearing to determine that such an order is necessary to preserve the property, pending the outcome of the criminal proceedings, and that there is probable cause to believe that the property alleged in the forfeiture proceedings are proceeds or property interests forfeitable under Section 5320. However, a temporary restraining order may issue pending that hearing pursuant to the provisions of Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(1) In determining whether to issue a preliminary injunction or temporary
 restraining order in a proceeding brought by a prosecuting agency in conjunction with or subsequent to the underlying criminal proceeding, the court shall weigh the relative degree of certainty of the outcome on the merits and the consequences to each of the parties of granting the interim relief. If the prosecution is likely to prevail on the merits and the potential harm to the public outweighs the potential harm to the defendants and the interested parties, the court should grant injunctive relief. The court shall give significant weight to the following factors:

(A) The public interest in preserving liquid capital and other financial assets pendente lite.

(B) The difficulty of preserving financial assets pendente lite where the underlying alleged crimes involve issues of fraud and moral turpitude.

(C) The fact
 that the requested relief is being sought by a public prosecutor on behalf of alleged victims of financial crimes.

(D) The likelihood that substantial public harm has occurred where financial crimes are alleged to have been committed.

(2) In determining whether to issue a permanent injunction or temporary restraining order in a proceeding brought by a prosecuting agency before the filing of a complaint in the underlying criminal proceeding, the court shall weigh the relative degree of certainty of the outcome on the merits and the consequences to each of the parties of granting the interim relief.

(3) No injunctive order issued under this section shall impair the ability of a defendant or interested party to pay the actual legal fees or retainer for his or her legal defense to the criminal charges and the petition
 for forfeiture.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court in granting these motions may order a surety bond or undertaking to preserve the property interests of the interested parties, but the court shall give significant weight to the unique circumstances of public agencies, as opposed to private litigants, in determining whether to order a surety bond or undertaking.

(d) The court shall, in making its orders, seek to protect the interests of those who may be involved in the same enterprise as the defendant, but who were not involved in the commission of the violation of a crime enumerated in Section 5320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5324.

(a) If the trier of fact at the forfeiture hearing finds that the alleged property or proceeds is forfeitable pursuant to Section 5320, the court shall declare that property or proceeds forfeited to the state or local governmental entity, subject to distribution as provided in Section 5325. No property solely owned by a bona fide purchaser for value shall be subject to forfeiture.

(b) If the trier of fact at the forfeiture hearing finds that the alleged property is forfeitable pursuant to Section 5320, but does not find that a person holding a valid lien, mortgage,
 security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract acquired that interest with actual knowledge that the property was to be used for a purpose for which forfeiture is permitted, and the amount due to that person is less than the appraised value of the property, that person may pay to the state or the local governmental entity which initiated the forfeiture proceeding, the amount of the difference between the appraised value of the property and the amount of the lien, mortgage, security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract. Upon that payment, the state or local governmental entity shall relinquish all claims to the property. If the holder of the interest elects not to make that payment to the state or local governmental entity, the property shall be deemed forfeited to the state or local governmental entity and any indicia of ownership of the property shall be forwarded. The appraised value shall be determined as of the date judgment is entered either (a) by agreement
 between the holder of the lien, mortgage, security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract and the governmental entity involved or (b) if they cannot agree, then by a court-appointed appraiser for the county in which the action is brought. A person holding a valid lien, mortgage, security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract shall be paid the appraised value of his or her interest.

(c) If the amount due to a person holding a valid lien, mortgage, security interest, or interest under a conditional sales contract is less than the value of the property and the person elects not to make payment to the governmental entity, the property shall be sold at public auction by the county if the district attorney is the prosecutor, by the city if the city attorney is the prosecutor, or by the Department of General Services if the Attorney General is the prosecutor. Notice of the sale shall be provided by one publication
 in a newspaper published and circulated in the city, community, or locality where the sale is to take place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

5325.

Notwithstanding that no response or claim has been filed pursuant to Section 5322, in all cases where property is forfeited pursuant to this article and, where necessary, sold by the Department of General Services or local governmental entity, the money forfeited or the proceeds of sale shall be distributed by the state or local governmental entity as follows:

(a) To the bona fide or innocent purchaser, conditional sales vendor, or holder of a valid lien, mortgage or security interest, if any, and
 from the balance of any forfeited funds to any victim of a crime enumerated in Section 5320 committed by the defendant, up to the amount of his or her interest in the property or proceeds, when the court declaring the forfeiture orders a distribution to that person. The court shall endeavor to discover all such lienholders and protect their interests and may, at its discretion, order the proceeds placed in escrow for up to an additional 60 days to ensure that all valid claims are received and processed. The aggregate of all money distributed pursuant to this subdivision and all money received pursuant to a restitution order of a court shall not exceed the amount of the person’s interest in the property or proceeds.

(b) To the Department of General Services or local governmental entity for all expenditures made or incurred by it in connection with the sale of the property, including expenditures for any necessary repairs, storage, or
 transportation of any property seized under this article.

(c) The balance of forfeiture funds remaining after the obligations in subdivisions (a) and (b) have been satisfied shall be paid to the general fund of the state or local governmental entity, whichever prosecutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1280, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Civil Penalties [5330. - 5330.]

5330.

The commissioner may impose civil penalties on any savings association, and any institution-affiliated party as follows:

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or in subdivisions (c) and (d), any savings association which, and any institution-affiliated party who, commits any of the following violations shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day during which the violation continues:

(1) Violation of any statute or regulation.

(2) Violation of any order issued by the commissioner.

(3) Violation of any condition imposed in writing by the commissioner in connection with the grant of any application or other request by the savings association.

(4) Violation of any written agreement between the savings association and the commissioner.

(b) Any savings association which, and any institution-affiliated party who, (1) commits any violation specified in subdivision (a), (2) recklessly engages in an unsafe or unsound practice in conducting the affairs of the savings association, or (3) breaches any fiduciary duty shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day during
 which the violation, practice, or breach continues if the violation, practice, or breach (1) is part of a pattern of misconduct, (2) causes or is likely to cause more than a minimal loss to the savings association, or (3), was committed by an institution-affiliated party and results in pecuniary gain or other benefit to that institution-affiliated party.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), any savings association which, and any institution-affiliated party who, (1) knowingly commits any violation specified in subdivision (a), engages in any unsafe or unsound practice in conducting the affairs of the savings association, or breaches any fiduciary duty, and (2) knowingly or recklessly causes a substantial loss to the savings association or, in the case of an institution-related party, a substantial pecuniary gain or other benefit to the institution-related party results by reason of violation, practice or breach, shall forfeit and pay a
 civil penalty in an amount not to exceed the maximum amount determined under this subdivision for each day during which the violation, practice, or breach continues. The maximum daily amount of any civil penalty which may be assessed pursuant to this subdivision for any violation, practice, or breach described in the subdivision is as follows:

(1) In the case of any person other than a savings association, an amount not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(2) In the case of any savings institution, an amount not to exceed the lesser of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or 1 percent of the total assets of the association.

(d) (1) Any penalty imposed under subdivisions (a), (b), or (c) may be assessed and collected by the commissioner by written notice.

(2) If, with respect to any assessment under paragraph (1) a hearing is not requested pursuant to subdivision (g) within the period of time allowed under subdivision (g), the assessment shall constitute a final and unappealable order.

(e) The commissioner may compromise, modify or remit any penalty which may be assessed or which has been assessed pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c).

(f) In determining the amount of any penalty imposed under subdivision (a), (b), or (c), the commissioner shall take into account the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to all of the following:

(1) The size of financial resources and good faith of the savings association or other person charged.

(2) The gravity of the violation, practice, or breach.

(3) The history of previous violations, unsafe or unsound practices, or breaches of fiduciary duty.

(4) Such other matters as justice may require.

(g) The savings association or other person against whom any penalty is assessed under this section shall be afforded a departmental hearing if the association or person submits a request for a hearing within 20 days after the issuance of the notice of assessment.

(h) (1) If any savings association or institution-related party fails to pay an assessment after any civil monetary penalty assessed under this section has become final, the department shall recover the amount assessed by action in superior court.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, review under Section 8055 of the validity or appropriateness of any civil penalty assessed under this section shall be conducted solely pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(i) All penalties collected under authority of this section shall be deposited in the Savings and Loan Account in the Financial Institutions Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 550.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Corporate Organization and Corporate Changes [5400. - 5868.]



  ARTICLE 1. Organizing Permit [5400. - 5403.]

5400.

(a) No funds from proposed stockholders, members, or organizers of any proposed association may be collected until a verified application for an organizing permit has been filed and a permit has been issued by the commissioner authorizing collection of funds, and then only in accordance with the terms of the permit.

(b) As used in this chapter, the term “organizer” means a person who agrees to contribute funds to a proposed association to be used for its organization expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5401.

The application for an organizing permit shall be in writing and shall be filed in the office of the commissioner. The application shall be executed and verified by the chairman of the organizers, who shall be elected by a majority vote of the organizers, and shall include the following:

(a) The names and addresses of the organizers of the proposed association and, to the extent known, its proposed directors and officers, together with the proposed amount of capital stock and savings accounts to be purchased and funds for organization expenses to be contributed by each.

(b) The proposed location of its office.

(c) A copy of any contract proposed to be used for the solicitation of subscriptions for stock and savings accounts and funds for its organization expenses. 

(d) A copy of any advertisement, circular, or other written matter proposed to be used for soliciting stock and savings accounts subscriptions and funds for organization expenses.

(e) An itemized estimate of the organization expenses proposed to be incurred. 

(f) A copy of the certificate of reservation of name issued under Section 5403. The name selected shall conform with the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 5650).

(g) Any additional information that the commissioner may require by written instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5402.

(a) The commissioner may impose conditions in an organizing permit concerning the deposit in escrow of funds collected pursuant to the permit, the manner of expenditure of the funds, and any other conditions deemed reasonable and necessary or advisable for the protection of the public, the subscribers, and the organizers.

(b) Contributions of organization expenses may be repaid to organizers on a pro rata basis by the association in amounts not to exceed its net income from operations after provision for statutory reserves.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5403.

(a) Before filing an application for an organizing permit with the commissioner under Section 5400, an organizer shall file with the Secretary of State an application for a certificate of a reservation of the name for the proposed association in accordance with the provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 5650).

(b) The application filed with the Secretary of State shall recite the fact of the application to be filed under Section 5400 and the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of reservation of name upon payment of any required fee.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 201 of the Corporations Code, the name contained in the certificate of reservation of the name shall be reserved to the applicant until (1) the commissioner denies the petition for a certificate of authority, or (2) if a certificate of approval of articles of incorporation is issued, as long as it continues in effect, or (3) for a period of up to one year from the date when the certificate of reservation of the name is issued, whichever of these occurs first.

(d) The Secretary of State may, upon the request of the applicant and the approval of the commissioner, extend the reservation of the name for an additional six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 868, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Petition for Certificate of Authority [5500. - 5506.]

5500.

Within 60 days after issuance of an organizing permit under Article 1 (commencing with Section 5400) any person may request authority to form a capital stock or mutual association by filing with the commissioner three copies of a petition for a certificate of authority and proposed articles of incorporation. The petition shall also be accompanied by three copies of proposed bylaws which shall make provisions for the following:

(a) Annual and special meetings of members or stockholders, and notice of meetings.

(b) Procedure
 for nomination of directors.

(c) Meetings of board of directors.

(d) Resignation and removal of directors.

(e) Compensation of directors.

(f) Officers.

(g) Execution of instruments.

(h) Evidence of savings accounts.

(i) Corporate seal.

(j) Fiscal year.

(k) Amendments.

(l) Disaster preparedness.

(m) Other matters, if any.

The petitioners shall submit with their petitions any applicable filing fee prescribed under Section 9001 and any statements, exhibits, maps, and other data that the commissioner may require by written instruction in a form which is sufficiently detailed and comprehensive to enable the commissioner to make a decision on the petition based on the criteria set out in Section 5502.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5501.

Upon receipt of a petition for a certificate of authority, the commissioner shall give written notice to each association that a petition for the issuance of a certificate has been made. The notice shall state the name of the proposed association, where the petitioners propose to establish the home office of the association, and if the commissioner determines that a hearing is to be held on the petition, the time and place of the hearing. The hearing shall be held 10 or more days after the mailing of the notice but in no event later than 60 days after the mailing of the notice. Any interested person may appear at the hearing in person or by agent or
 attorney, and orally or in writing show cause upon any relevant ground why a certificate should not be issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5501.5.

The articles of incorporation of each domestic association incorporated after January 1, 1984, shall include a statement that it is formed for each of the following purposes:

(a) To engage primarily in the specific business of a savings association and any other lawful activities not prohibited to a savings association by applicable laws and regulations.

(b) To encourage industry, frugality, home building, and the accumulation of savings. That statement shall add either “among its members” or “among its savings account
 holders” and may also add “and among others.”

(c) For the loaning of the money accumulated, with the interest and earnings thereon. The statement shall add either “to its members” or “to its savings account holders” and the statement may also add “and to others.”

(d) For the repayment subject to the provisions of this division and any act amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto of the savings and interest to each savings account holder whenever the savings account holder desires to withdraw the same, or when the association desires to repay the same.

(e) In the case of a stock association, for the purpose of issuing capital stock and savings accounts.

(f) In the case of a mutual association, for the purpose of accumulating capital by the issuance of
 savings accounts and to grant holders of savings accounts the right to be a member of the association with entitlement to one vote for each one hundred dollars ($100) of the withdrawal value of each savings account to be voted in person or by proxy to transact the business of the association.

(g) For any and all purposes specified in the Savings Association Law with all the rights, powers, privileges and immunities as set forth in that law.

The above provisions are in lieu of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 202 of the Corporations Code and may be supplemented or modified with such provisions as the commissioner may approve.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5502.

The commissioner shall not approve any petition for certificate of authority unless it is found from the data furnished with the petition, the evidence adduced at the hearing, if one is held, and official records, that the prerequisites of this division have been complied with and that:

(a) The character, responsibility, financial resources, and general fitness of the persons named in the petition warrant belief that the business of the proposed association will be honestly and efficiently conducted in accordance with the intent and purpose of this division and that the proposed association
 will have qualified full-time management.

(b) There is a public need for the proposed association and the business plan, and the anticipated volume of business of the proposed association indicates a profitable operation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5503.

(a) The commissioner shall, within a reasonable time after the petition is filed, or within a reasonable time after the hearing, if one is held, either approve or deny the petition for a certificate of authority.

(b) If approved, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of approval of the articles of incorporation of the association and shall issue a notice of conditional approval of the petition for a certificate of authority. Upon satisfaction of all of the conditions in the notice, the commissioner shall execute and issue to the association a certificate of
 authority.

(c) If denied, upon written request of any petitioner, the commissioner shall provide the statutory reason for denial. Denial of the petition is a final decision and the petitioner shall not be entitled to any further administrative remedy. The petitioner shall discontinue the use of the reserved name and provide evidence to the commissioner that the Secretary of State has been notified to release the name reservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 730, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5504.

Upon issuance of a certificate of approval of articles of incorporation to a proposed association, the commissioner shall attach the original signed copy of the certificate of approval to the original signed copy of the articles and deliver it to the proposed association for filing with the Secretary of State. Corporate existence shall begin on the date of filing of the articles with the Secretary of State. Prior to the date the commissioner issues the association a certificate of authority, the activities of the association shall be limited to completing its organization activities and the association shall not open its office for transacting business
 with the public.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5505.

The articles of incorporation of a proposed association shall not be filed in the office of the Secretary of State unless a certificate of approval of the articles of incorporation issued by the commissioner is attached thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5506.

Within 30 days after the corporate existence of an association begins, the directors of the association shall hold an organization meeting and shall elect officers pursuant to the provisions of this division and the bylaws. At the organization meeting, the directors shall take any other action that is appropriate in connection with the organization of the association. The commissioner may extend by order the time within which the organization meeting shall be held.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Postincorporation Organization of Associations [5600. - 5618.]

5600.

(a) The board of directors of an association which is in the process of organization shall select a financial institution within this state as a depository for stock, savings account and mutual capital certificate subscription funds.

(b) The financial institution shall assure the safekeeping of the subscription funds and the delivery of these funds to the association after the issuance of the certificate of authority and after the bonding of the officers. In the event of the failure to complete the organization of the association and to commence business, the financial
 institution shall insure the return of the amounts collected to the respective subscribers or their assigns, plus any earnings on the funds, less reasonable charges of the financial institution for services as depository of the funds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5601.

Before a certificate of authority is issued, the capital of the association shall be paid into the association and, in the case of stock, shall be the sum of the par or initially stated value of all shares of capital stock, plus the initial paid-in surplus. The minimum required capital shall be established by regulations, or instructions, issued by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.5.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5602.

In addition to the minimum capital required, the commissioner may require that the consideration for the issuance of capital stock shall be sufficient to create a paid-in surplus in an amount satisfactory to the commissioner. The minimum capital and surplus may be used for the reserves required by law and for other purposes as may be permitted by the board of directors, provided that the par value or stated value of the stock subscribed shall be maintained as the permanent capital of the association, as required by Sections 5604 and 5605.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5603.

In the case of a stock association, prior to issuance of a certificate of authority, the association shall file with the commissioner a statement in a form and with supporting data and proof that the commissioner may require, that verifies that the entire capital and paid-in surplus has been unconditionally paid in, that these funds are on deposit with the depository financial institution, and that all conditions contained in the notice of conditional approval of the petition for a certificate of authority have been met.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5604.

(a) In the case of a stock association, on or after the date the commissioner issues the association a certificate of authority, the association shall issue the capital stock necessary to satisfy the minimum capital requirements of Section 5601 and any additional capital stock approved for issuance by its board of directors, up to the amount authorized in its articles of incorporation, and shall issue no additional shares except as authorized in this division.

(b) The capital stock of an association, when issued, shall constitute permanent capital and shall not be
 retired or withdrawn except as provided in this division until all liabilities of the association have been satisfied in full, including the withdrawal value of all savings accounts, and until outstanding capital certificates have been retired.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5605.

(a) Any association that does not commence business within one year after the date of the issuance of its certificate of approval of articles of incorporation shall forfeit its certificate of approval of articles of incorporation, unless the commissioner, before the expiration of the one year period, shall have approved the extension of time within which it may commence business, upon a written application stating the reasons for delay. Upon forfeiture, the association’s certificate of approval of articles of incorporation shall expire. Amounts credited on savings accounts or paid in on capital stock, including any income earned on
 these funds, shall be returned on a pro rata basis to their respective subscribers.

(b) The commissioner shall immediately notify the Secretary of State of forfeiture under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 361, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5606.

(a) Prior to doing business in this state, an association shall obtain and maintain insurance of its savings accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(b) Prior to doing business in this state, a foreign savings association, as defined in Sections 10000 and 10010, shall maintain insurance of its savings accounts by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(c) The commissioner may enforce any statutes pertaining to, or any regulations of, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the
 Office of Thrift Supervision insofar as those statutes and regulations apply to associations, and may enforce any and all other federal statutes and regulations applicable to associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

5612.

For the purposes of this article, “security” means any stock, subordinated debenture, warrant, or right or option to purchase any stock issued by an association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5613.

(a) No association shall sell, except upon a sale for a delinquent assessment made in accordance with the provisions of the General Corporation Law, or offer for sale, or take subscriptions for, or issue any of its securities (except stock dividends), until the association has applied for and obtained from the commissioner a permit authorizing it to offer, sell or issue that security.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an association may enter into agreements for the sale of securities with accredited investors (as defined in Section 230. 215 of the Securities
 Exchange Commission regulations) or persons approved by the commissioner prior to obtaining a permit pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The commissioner may, by regulation, instruction, or order exclude certain transactions from the operation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5614.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no issued and outstanding stock of an association shall be sold or offered for sale to the public, nor shall subscriptions be solicited or taken for those sales, until the association or the selling stockholders have applied for and obtained from the commissioner a permit authorizing the sale of the capital stock.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) An offering involving less than 10 percent of the issued and outstanding capital stock
 of an association and less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(2) An offering made under a registration statement filed under the Securities Act of 1933.

(3) Any offering exempted by regulation, instruction, or order issued in writing by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 730, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5615.

An application for a permit to sell securities shall be in writing, verified as provided in the Code of Civil Procedure for the verification of pleadings, and shall be filed in the office of the commissioner by the association or the selling stockholders. The application shall include the following:

(a) Regarding the association.

(1) The names and addresses of its officers.

(2) The location of its office.

(3) A balance sheet or statement of its financial condition as of a date within 90 days of the filing date.

(4) A copy of all minutes of any proceedings of its directors, shareholders, or stockholders relating to or affecting the issue of such securities.

(b) Regarding the offering.

(1) A brief description of the method by which the securities are to be offered for sale, including the offering price and the underwriting commissions and expense, if any.

(2) A copy of a prospectus or advertisement or other description of the securities prepared for distribution or publication in accordance with requirements prescribed by the commissioner.

(3) A copy of any contract concerning
 the sale of the securities.

(4) With respect to any permit issued pursuant to Section 5614, the names and addresses of the selling stockholders and of the officers of any selling corporation and the partners of any selling partnership.

(c) Such additional information as the commissioner may require.

(d) An application fee as prescribed by the commissioner pursuant to Section 9001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5616.

Upon the filing of the application for a permit to sell securities, the commissioner shall examine the application and other papers and documents filed therewith, and he or she may make a detailed examination, audit, and investigation of the association and its affairs. If the commissioner finds that the proposed plan for the issue and sale of such securities is fair, just, and equitable, the commissioner shall issue to the applicant a permit authorizing it to issue and dispose of its securities in such amounts and for such considerations and upon such terms and conditions as the commissioner may provide in the permit. If the commissioner does not so
 find, the commissioner shall deny the application and notify the applicant in writing of his or her decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5617.

Every permit to sell securities shall recite in bold type that the issuance thereof is permissive only and does not constitute a recommendation or endorsement of the securities permitted to be issued.
